Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.431

Conference—Procedure and participation.

(1) Agencies may hold prehearing or other conferences for the settlement or simplification of issues. Every agency shall by rule describe the conditions under which and the manner in which conferences are to be held.

(2) In the discretion of the presiding officer, and where the rights of the parties will not be prejudiced thereby, all or part of the conference may be conducted by telephone, television, or other electronic means. Each participant in the conference must have an opportunity to participate effectively in, to hear, and, if technically and economically feasible, to see the entire proceeding while it is taking place.

[ 1988 c 288 s 408.]